Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1404
Family resource and juvenile assessment center; designation; criteria.

To receive designation as a family resource and juvenile assessment center under section 42-1403, an applicant shall meet the following criteria: (1) Offer a range of core services, including parenting support, youth counseling, economic success initiatives, early childhood programs, conflict resolution, mental health services, and substance abuse prevention; (2) employ professionals trained in family support principles, cultural competency, trauma-informed care, and the strengthening families framework; (3) develop partnerships with local grassroots organizations to provide culturally relevant services, outreach, and trust-building within the community; (4) demonstrate a clear, effective organizational framework that supports service delivery, continuous quality improvement, and sustainable operations; and (5) implement data collection processes to assess service impact and outcomes for youth and families, ensuring program adjustments based on feedback.

Laws 2025, LB48, § 4.